Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1034.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3406xx. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, an insurer that delivers, issues for delivery, or renews in this state a health insurance policy shall not deny or limit coverage for prescription inhalers to enable an individual to breathe when suffering from asthma or other life-threatening bronchial ailments based on any restriction on the number of days before an inhaler refill may be obtained if, contrary to those restrictions, the inhalants have been ordered or prescribed by the treating physician and are medically appropriate. (2) An insurer described in subsection (1) shall provide the coverage required under subsection (1) at no cost to the insured. (3) As used in this section, "prescription inhaler" means a prescribed medical device that delivers inhaled medications used to treat breathing for persons suffering from asthma or other life-threatening bronchial ailments. Prescription inhaler includes metered-dose inhalers, nebulizers, and dry powder inhalers. Prescription inhaler does not include an inhaler available over the counter without a prescription to provide temporary relief from respiratory symptoms.